Utah statutes.
53A-17a-131.17.   State contribution for School LAND Trust Program.

(1)  If the amount of money prescribed for funding the School LAND Trust Program in Section 53A-16-101.5 is less than or greater than the money appropriated for the School LAND Trust Program, the appropriation shall be equal to the amount of money prescribed for funding the School LAND Trust Program in Section 53A-16-101.5, up to a maximum of an amount equal to 2% of the funds provided for the Minimum School Program.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall distribute the money appropriated in Subsection (1) in accordance with Section 53A-16-101.5 and rules established by the board in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2010 General Session

